apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="centocinquant/a__num">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>         <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'anni</l>     <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/>anno<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>a</l>     <r>a<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amila</l>     <r>amila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="centocinquanta__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mila</l>      <r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="vent/i__num">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'</l>         <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>'anni</l>     <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/>anno<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>i</l>     <r>i<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>imila</l>     <r>imila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="centocinquanta(2)__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mila</l>      <r>mila</r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="cinquantatr/é__num">
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>é<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emila</l>     <r>emila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="cinquantatr/é(2)__num">
  <e>       <p><l>é</l>         <r>é</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>emila</l>     <r>emila</r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="un/o__num">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>o<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="cinquantun/o__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>o<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omila</l>     <r>omila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e lm="cinquanta">       <i>cinquant</i><par n="centocinquant/a__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantacinque"> <i>cinquantacinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantadue">    <i>cinquantadue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantanove">   <i>cinquantanove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantaquattro"><i>cinquantaquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantasei">    <i>cinquantasei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantasette">  <i>cinquantasette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantatré">    <i>cinquantatr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinquantotto">    <i>cinquantotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="cinque">          <i>cinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="diciannove">      <i>diciannove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="diciassette">     <i>diciassette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="diciotto">        <i>diciotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="dieci">           <i>dieci</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="dodici">          <i>dodici</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="due">             <i>due</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="novanta">         <i>novant</i><par n="centocinquant/a__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantacinque">   <i>novantacinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantadue">      <i>novantadue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantanove">     <i>novantanove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantaquattro">  <i>novantaquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantasei">      <i>novantasei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantasette">    <i>novantasette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantatré">      <i>novantatr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="novantotto">      <i>novantotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="nove">            <i>nove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottanta">         <i>ottant</i><par n="centocinquant/a__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantacinque">   <i>ottantacinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantadue">      <i>ottantadue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantanove">     <i>ottantanove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantaquattro">  <i>ottantaquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantasei">      <i>ottantasei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantasette">    <i>ottantasette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantatré">      <i>ottantatr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="ottantotto">      <i>ottantotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="otto">            <i>otto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quaranta">        <i>quarant</i><par n="centocinquant/a__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantacinque">  <i>quarantacinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantadue">     <i>quarantadue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantanove">    <i>quarantanove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantaquattro"> <i>quarantaquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantasei">     <i>quarantasei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantasette">   <i>quarantasette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantatré">     <i>quarantatr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="quarantotto">     <i>quarantotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quattordici">     <i>quattordici</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quattro">         <i>quattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="quindici">        <i>quindici</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sedici">          <i>sedici</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sei">             <i>sei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessanta">        <i>sessant</i><par n="centocinquant/a__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantacinque">  <i>sessantacinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantadue">     <i>sessantadue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantanove">    <i>sessantanove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantaquattro"> <i>sessantaquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantasei">     <i>sessantasei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantasette">   <i>sessantasette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantatré">     <i>sessantatr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="sessantotto">     <i>sessantotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="settanta">        <i>settant</i><par n="centocinquant/a__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantacinque">  <i>settantacinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantadue">     <i>settantadue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantanove">    <i>settantanove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantaquattro"> <i>settantaquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantasei">     <i>settantasei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantasette">   <i>settantasette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantatré">     <i>settantatr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="settantotto">     <i>settantotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="sette">           <i>sette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="tre">             <i>tre</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="tredici">         <i>tredici</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="trenta">          <i>trent</i><par n="centocinquant/a__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentacinque">    <i>trentacinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentadue">       <i>trentadue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentanove">      <i>trentanove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentaquattro">   <i>trentaquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentasei">       <i>trentasei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentasette">     <i>trentasette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentatré">       <i>trentatr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="trentotto">       <i>trentotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="uno">             <i>un</i><par n="un/o__num"/></e>
<e lm="undici">          <i>undici</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="venti">           <i>vent</i><par n="vent/i__num"/></e>
<e lm="venticinque">     <i>venticinque</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ventidue">        <i>ventidue</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ventinove">       <i>ventinove</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ventiquattro">    <i>ventiquattro</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ventisei">        <i>ventisei</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ventisette">      <i>ventisette</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
<e lm="ventitré">        <i>ventitr</i><par n="cinquantatr/é__num"/></e>
<e lm="ventotto">        <i>ventotto</i><par n="centocinquanta__num"/></e>
